District of Columbia statutes.
5-201

United States watchmen to be known as United States Park Police; powers and duties.

The watchmen provided by the United States government for service in any of the public squares and reservations in the District of Columbia shall, after August 5, 1882, be known as the “United States Park Police.” They shall have and perform the same powers and duties as the Metropolitan Police of the District.

Aug. 5, 1882, 22 Stat. 243, ch. 389, § 1
Dec. 5, 1919, 41 Stat. 364, ch. 1,§ 3
1981 Ed., § 4-201.
1973 Ed., § 4-201.